Utah statutes.
10-8-56.   Storage of combustibles and explosives -- Use of lights --
Bonfires.
They may regulate or prevent the storage of gunpowder, tar, pitch, resin,
coal, oil, gas, gasoline, benzine, turpentine, nitroglycerine, petroleum or
any of the products thereof, and other combustible or explosive substances or
materials, and the use of lights in stables, shops and other places, and the
building of bonfires.
